Utah statutes.
31A-9-502.   Voluntary dissolution of solvent domestic fraternals.
(1)  Subject to this section, a domestic fraternal may voluntarily dissolve
under Sections 16-6a-1401 through 16-6a-1405.
(2)  The proposal for voluntary dissolution shall be filed with the
commissioner at least 60 days prior to the submission of that proposal to the
supreme governing body or the members.  The commissioner may require the
submission of additional information necessary to establish the financial
condition of the fraternal or other facts relevant to the proposed
dissolution.  If the supreme governing body or the members adopt the
resolution to dissolve, by a majority of those voting or a larger number as
required by the laws of the fraternal, the commissioner shall, within 30 days
after the adoption of the resolution, begin to examine the fraternal.  The
commissioner shall approve the dissolution unless the commissioner finds,
after the examination and a hearing, that it is insolvent or may become
insolvent in the process of dissolution.  Upon approval, the fraternal may
provide for a transfer to other fraternals approved by the commissioner of all
its obligations under insurance policies and then may dissolve under
Subsection (1).  If the commissioner disapproves, the commissioner shall
petition the court for liquidation under Section 31A-27a-207.
(3)  During the liquidation under Sections 16-6a-1401 through 16-6a-1408, the
fraternal may apply to the commissioner to have the liquidation continued
under the commissioner's supervision.  Upon receiving this request, the
commissioner shall apply to the court for liquidation under Section 31A-
27a-207.
(4)  If the fraternal revokes the voluntary dissolution proceedings under
Section 16-6a-1404, a copy of the revocation of voluntary dissolution
proceedings shall be filed with the commissioner.
(5)  Subsections 31A-5-504(6) and (7) apply to the survival of remedies and
continuance of corporate existence of a voluntarily dissolved fraternal.
